Illinois, session 104th, SB210.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Professional Regulation Law 5of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by 6adding Section 2105-371 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2105/2105-371 new)8    Sec. 2105-371. License extension during a public health 9emergency.10    (a) For the purposes of this Section, "health care 11professional" means a physician licensed under the Medical 12Practice Act of 1987, a dentist licensed under the Illinois 13Dental Practice Act, an optometrist licensed under the 14Illinois Optometric Practice Act of 1987, a physician 15assistant licensed under the Physician Assistant Practice Act 16of 1987, and a registered nurse or advanced practice 17registered nurse licensed under the Nurse Practice Act.18    (b) For any license of a health care professional that 19expires during a public health emergency declared by the 20Governor, the Department shall extend the expiration date of 21that license by 3 months. The fees for renewal of that license 22and the expiration date of the renewed license shall be the 23same fees and expiration date as though the license was   SB0210- 2 -LRB104 03630 AAS 13654 b1renewed on the original expiration date. 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.